North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Meetings and Action of the Board.

§ 55A-8-20.
Regular and special meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this State.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear and be heard by each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 314, s. 3; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 24, 25; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2021-162, s. 2(p).

§ 55A-8-21.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this Chapter to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. The action shall be evidenced by one or more written consents signed by each director before or after the action, describing the action taken, and included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken. As authorized in

G.S. 55A-1-70

, a director’s consent to action taken without meeting may be in electronic form and delivered by electronic means.

Action taken under this section is effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

History.

1973, c. 314, s. 3; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 2008-37, s. 7; 2021-162, s. 2(q).

§ 55A-8-22.
Notice of meetings.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose of the meeting.

Special meetings of the board of directors shall be held upon such notice as is provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or in the absence of any such provision, upon notice sent by any usual means of communication not less than five days before the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by: (i) this Chapter, (ii) the articles of incorporation, or (iii) the bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the presiding officer of the board, the president or twenty percent (20%) of the directors then in office may call and give notice of a meeting of the board.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 24, 25; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-23.
Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice required by this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the waiver shall be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to him of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 24, 25; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 29.

§ 55A-8-24.
Quorum and voting.

Except as otherwise provided in: (i) this Chapter, (ii) the articles of incorporation, or (iii) the bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the directors in office immediately before a meeting begins. In no event may the articles of incorporation or bylaws authorize a quorum of fewer than one-third of the number of directors in office.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board unless: (i) this Chapter, (ii) the articles of incorporation, or (iii) the bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

He objects at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon his arrival) to holding it or transacting business at the meeting;

His dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

He files written notice of his dissent or abstention with the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or with the corporation immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 33; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is generally based on

G.S. 55-8-24

; however, unlike

G.S. 55-8-24

and former G.S. 55A-22, but like Section 8.24 of the Model Act, it defines a quorum in terms of the number of directors in office instead of the number of directors authorized.

§ 55A-8-25.
Committees of the board.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one or more committees of the board and appoint members of the board to serve on them. Each committee shall have two or more members, who serve at the pleasure of the board.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under

G.S. 55A-8-24

.

G.S. 55A-8-20

through

G.S. 55A-8-24

, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board, apply to committees of the board and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee of the board may exercise the board’s authority under

G.S. 55A-8-01

.

A committee of the board shall not, however:

Authorize distributions;

Recommend to members or approve dissolution, merger or the sale, pledge, or transfer of all or substantially all of the corporation’s assets;

Elect, appoint or remove directors, or fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees; or

Adopt, amend, or repeal the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in

G.S. 55A-8-30

.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1969, c. 875, s. 5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 22, 23; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (e), unlike former G.S. 55A-23(a)(5), does not prohibit a committee from fixing the compensation of directors.

§§ 55A-8-26 through 55A-8-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.